Terms of Use
Effective Date:
May 28th, 2024
These Terms of Service (the “Terms”) and our
Privacy Policy
govern the relationship between you and ATHENA STUDIO (“Studio,” “our,” “we,” or “us”) and apply to your use of our Services.  The “Services” include our website https://athena.studio/ (the “Site”), web store (if applicable), mobile applications or games, related services and content, and any additional products, services, features, and content that we may provide or make available through the Services.
Please read these Terms of Service (the “Terms”) and our
Privacy Policy
carefully before using our Services.  These Terms set out the terms and conditions that apply when you use the Services.
By using our Services, and by continuing to use the Services after any future changes to these Terms, you confirm that you have carefully read, understood, and agree to be bound to these Terms, particularly those provisions that restrict or exempt liabilities.
In addition, our
Privacy Policy
describes how we collect, use, disclose, share, and otherwise process your personal information when providing the Services to you, as well as your rights and choices concerning your information.  If you do not agree to these
Terms, or if you do not want us to collect, use, disclose, share, or otherwise process your information in the ways described in our
Privacy Policy
, you must not use our Services (or you must stop using our Services if you have already started using them).
To use the Services, you must be 16 years of age or older and over the age of majority in your jurisdiction.  If you are under 18 years of age, or under the age of majority where you live, your legal guardian must provide consent to your use of the Services.  As described below, United States law governs these Terms, and the Services may fall within United States export controls.  You may not use the Services if United States law or other applicable law preclude you from receiving products, including services or software, from the United States.
SECTION 16 OF THIS AGREEMENT CONTAINS AN INFORMAL DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS, A BINDING AGREEMENT TO ARBITRATION, AND A CONSOLIDATED, CLASS ACTION, COLLECTIVE ACTION, AND REPRESENTATIVE ACTION WAIVER, WHICH WAIVE YOUR RIGHT TO A COURT HEARING OR A TRIAL BEFORE A JUDGE OR JURY, SUBJECT TO CERTAIN EXCEPTIONS.  IN ADDITION, SECTION 13 CONTAINS WARRANTY DISCLAIMERS AND A LIMITATION OF OUR LIABILITY, INCLUDING A RELEASE BY YOU OF CLAIMS FOR DAMAGES RELATED TO THE SERVICES.  PLEASE READ SECTIONS 13 AND 16 AND THESE TERMS CAREFULLY.  BY USING THE SERVICES, YOU AGREE TO THESE PROVISIONS.
Table of Contents
The Services; Changes to the Services or the Terms
Eligibility to Use the Services
Our Retained Proprietary Rights; Your Limited License to the Services
Our Privacy Policy
Your User Content and Responsibility for It; Our License to Your User Content and Right to Monitor the Use of Services
Code of Conduct and Our Enforcement Rights
Your Sole Responsibility for Interactions with Other Users; Your Release of Us
Report Conduct or User Content on the Services; Trademark & DMCA/Copyright Policy
In-Game Purchases, Virtual Items, and Payment Terms
Links to Third-Party Websites, Resources, or Advertising
Ending Your Relationship with the Services (and vice versa)
Your Indemnification of Us
Warranty Disclaimers and Limitation of Our Liability
Time Limitation on Your Claims against Us
Governing Law and Venue for Legal Disputes Not Subject to Arbitration
Informal Dispute Resolution Process; Agreement to Arbitration; Consolidated, Class Action, Collective Action, and Representative Action Waiver
Miscellaneous Provisions
Contact Us
* * * *
The Services; Changes to the Services or the Terms
The “Services” include our website (as defined above), our web store (if applicable), mobile applications or games, related services and content, and any additional products, services, features, and content that we may provide or make available through the Services.
Registration and Account Information
— You may need to register and create an account (or sign-in through a third-party platform) to access the Services or some portion of them.
You must provide us (and any related third-party platform) with accurate, complete, and up-to-date account information.  In addition, you may not authorize others to use your account, and you may not assign or otherwise transfer your account or these Terms to any other person or entity.  You also understand that you must keep your account information secure and that you should not disclose your account credentials to anyone.  You alone remain solely responsible for all activities that occur under your account, regardless of whether you know about them or not.
Updates to the Services
— We may from time-to-time update, improve, enhance, conduct testing, and further develop the Services (for example, in the form of bug fixes, enhancements, security patches, new software modules, or new versions).  You understand that these improvements, enhancements, or tests may impact your user experience.  From time to time, we may make you update your software or hardware to continue to use our Services.  If you choose to allow automatic updates, the Services may also automatically download and install updates.  If you do not want to download and install updates automatically, you can turn off automatic updates at any time through the “Settings” menu or similar feature of your device.
Notifications and Messages from the Services
— We may from time-to-time send you notifications, alerts, text messages, or other types of messages (including email) regarding the Services, your account(s), or certain other products, services, features, or content that may be of interest to you.  By using the Services, you consent to receive these messages and marketing messages from us, our affiliates, or providers.  If you do not want to receive notifications, you can turn off notifications through the “Settings” menu or similar feature of your device.  In addition, you can cancel text messages (if you receive them) at any time by replying “STOP.”  Please note that messaging fees may apply depending on the message plan you have with your wireless carrier.  Please contact your wireless carrier for details about your text or data plan.
Hardware and Software Requirements
— The functionalities and features of the Services may vary depending on the device and operating system that you use, the way in which you interact with the Services, your region, the changing requirements of applicable laws, and other factors.  To use the Services, you need compatible hardware and software (and potentially the latest versions of that software), and internet access, among other technological features.  The performance of the Services may be affected by these or related factors, each of which we do not control.  You remain solely responsible for any third-party costs you incur to use the Services, including equipment, internet, and other connection charges.  Your access and use of the Services may also be interrupted from time to time due to third-party failures outside of our control or the need for periodic maintenance, updates, or repairs.  As explained below, we make no representations or warranties of any kind with respect to the performance or availability of the Services.
Changes to the Services
— Because our Services evolve over time, we may at any time, at our sole discretion, modify, suspend, restrict, terminate, or cancel the Services or any portion of them.  In addition, we may add or remove features or functionality of the Services or any portion of them at any time, and we may suspend, restrict, delete, or remove access to the Services or any portion of them.
In addition, we reserve the right to stop offering and/or supporting the Services or any portion of them at any time either permanently or temporarily, at which point your right to use the Services or any part of them will be automatically terminated or suspended.  If any of these things happen, unless required by applicable law or otherwise agreed to by us, we will not provide refunds, benefits, or other compensation to you in connection with the discontinued aspects or elements of the Services or for Virtual Items (as defined below) previously earned or purchased.
WE MAY, IN OUR SOLE DISCRETION, LIMIT, SUSPEND, TERMINATE, MODIFY, OR DELETE ACCOUNTS OR ACCESS TO THE SERVICES OR ANY PORTION OF THEM; PROHIBIT ACCESS TO OUR GAMES AND SITES, AND THEIR CONTENT, SERVICES, AND TOOLS; OR DELAY OR REMOVE HOSTED CONTENT, AND WE ARE UNDER NO OBLIGATION TO COMPENSATE YOU FOR ANY LOSSES OR RESULTS, UNLESS REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
Changes to the Terms
— In addition, we may modify or update these Terms at any time.  If we modify or update these Terms, we will post the modified Terms.  In addition, we may notify you directly through the Services.  By continuing to use the Services after those modifications or updates become effective, you agree to be bound by the revised Terms.  If you do not agree to be bound by the revised Agreement, then you must not use the Services anymore.
Eligibility to Use the Services
To use the Services, you must be 16 years of age or older (and over the age of majority in your jurisdiction) and not barred from using the Services under applicable law.  If you are under 18 years of age, or under the age of majority where you live, your legal guardian must provide consent to your use of the Services.
In addition, you may not use our Services under any of the following circumstances:
You cannot enter into a binding contract with us under applicable law.
You are a “child” as defined under applicable law.
You are not allowed to receive products, including services or software, from the United States, for example if you live in a country embargoed by the United States or if you are on the U.S. Treasury Department’s list of Specially Designated Nationals.
You cannot access or use the Services in compliance with these Terms under the applicable laws of your jurisdiction.
You are a convicted sex offender.
You have previously been banned from our Services or any aspect of them (or the Services of one of our affiliates), unless we reversed that ban in our sole discretion.
Our Retained Proprietary Rights; Your Limited License to the Services
Except for the limited license granted herein, we and our licensors (or other providers) retain all legal right, title, and interest in and to all other elements of the Services, including all of the intellectual property associated with the Services, the technology and software used to provide the Services, any improvements or derivative products or services, and all other aspects of the Services.  We reserve all rights not expressly granted to you.
Your Limited License to the Services
— Subject to your agreement and continuing compliance with these Terms (including the Code of Conduct set forth below), we grant you a non-exclusive, non-transferable, non-sublicensable, revocable limited license to access and use the Services for your own personal, non-commercial, and entertainment use.  You agree not to use the Services for any other purpose, including for any commercial or non-personal purpose.  You also agree not to modify, create derivative works of, decompile, or otherwise attempt to extract source code from any aspect of the Services.  Any unauthorized use will terminate this limited license, subject your account to immediate suspension or termination, and may also violate applicable laws.
Our License to Your Feedback
— If you make suggestions regarding any features, functionality, or performance of the Array Services that we adopt, such features, functionality, and performance shall be deemed automatically assigned to us under these Terms and become our sole and exclusive property.  To the extent permitted by applicable law, you waive any moral rights you may have in such suggestions and feedback.
Consequences of Your Violations
— If you violate these Terms, or any of our other terms that apply to you, we may in our sole discretion terminate your account or take other lawful steps with or without notice to you.  ANY ATTEMPT BY YOU TO DISRUPT OR INTERFERE WITH THE SERVICES, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, UNDERMINING OR MANIPULATING THE LEGITIMATE OPERATION OF THE SERVICES OR ANY ASPECT OF THEM, VIOLATES THESE TERMS AND MAY BE A BREACH OF CRIMINAL OR CIVIL LAWS.
Our Privacy Policy
Our
Privacy Policy
describes how we collect, use, disclose, share, and otherwise process your personal information when providing the Services to you, as well as your rights and choices concerning your information.  When you use the Services, you acknowledge that the
Privacy Policy
applies.  If you do not want us to collect, use, disclose, share, and otherwise process your information in the ways described in our
Privacy Policy
, you must not use the Services.
Your User Content and Responsibility for It; Our License to Your User Content and Right to Monitor the Use of Services
Your User Content and Responsibility for It
— The Services may contain various forums, networks, and other features or functionality that allow you to post, submit, publish, display, share, or transmit to us and other users (collectively, “Post”) content or materials (“User Content”) on or through the Services.  All User Content must comply with the following content standards: User Content must not be illegal, fraudulent, deceptive, obscene, threatening, defamatory, invasive of privacy, infringing of intellectual property rights, or otherwise injurious to third parties or objectionable, and must not consist of or contain software viruses (or other malicious code), commercial solicitation, chain letters, mass mailings, or any form of “spam.”
In Posting User Content, you represent and warrant that:
You own or otherwise control all of the rights to the User Content that you Post.
The User Content will be accurate and not fraudulent or deceptive.
The User Content does not violate these Terms or the rights (intellectual property rights or otherwise) of any third party and will not cause injury to any person or entity.
You understand that your User Content may be copied by other users and discussed on and outside of the Services, and if you do not have the right to Post User Content, you may be subject to liability.  We take no responsibility and assume no liability for any User Content Posted by you or any third party.  In addition, we do not endorse or guarantee the accuracy, efficacy, veracity, or appropriateness of any User Content.
Under all circumstances, you remain personally and solely responsible for all of your User Content.
Our License to Your User Content
— Any User Content that you Post will be considered non-confidential and non-proprietary, and you grant us a nonexclusive, royalty-free, perpetual, irrevocable, and fully sublicensable right to use, copy, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, create derivative works from, distribute, and display such User Content throughout the world in any media, without notice or compensation to you.  To the extent permitted by applicable law, you waive any rights of attribution or moral rights you may have in your User Content.
Our Right to Monitor User Content and the Use of Services
— We have no obligation to monitor the Services or the conduct of other players.  In addition, we are not responsible for, and we do not approve, information or materials provided by you to other players or provided by other players to you, including all User Content.  By using our Services, you understand that you may be exposed to content or conduct that you might find offensive or otherwise objectionable.  In addition, communications made using or through the Services should not be considered private and you should avoid revealing personally identifiable information.
We may monitor and/or record your communications (including communications in chat features) when you use the Services, and you hereby provide your irrevocable, express consent to such monitoring and recording.  In addition, we have the right but not the obligation to edit, remove, or refuse to post any User Content for any reason.  Depending upon the applicable law, you may be able to appeal or seek clarifications regarding our content moderation decisions.  You may exercise this right, if applicable, by contacting Customer Support at privacy@athena.studio.
Code of Conduct and Our Enforcement Rights
When you access or use the Services (or any aspect of them), you agree that you will not, under any circumstances:
Use the Services, intentionally or unintentionally, in violation or breach of any applicable law or regulation, or in a way that may put us in violation or breach of any applicable law or regulation, or in a way that promotes the violation or breach of any applicable law or regulation.
Engage in any act that we deem, in our sole discretion, to conflict with the spirit or intent of the Services, including circumventing or manipulating these Terms, game rules, game mechanics, or any other rules or policies, or attempting to access the Services in an unauthorized manner.
Fail to abide by the terms and conditions of any third-party platform provider through which you access and/or use the Services, including all terms and conditions that apply to any payment you make through any platform or to us.
Interfere with or disrupt other players’ use of the Services, which includes disrupting the normal game play or game mechanics, chat, or dialogue within the Services by, for example, using vulgar, offensive, or harassing language, being abusive, excessive shouting (all caps), spamming, flooding, hitting the return key repeatedly, or engaging in similar conduct.
Harass, threaten, bully, embarrass, spam, or do anything else that may be offensive or objectionable to another player or to our employees (including Customer Support), such as repeatedly sending unwanted messages, using profanity, making threats, or making discriminatory statements about race, sexual orientation, religion, heritage, etc. Hate speech of any form will not be tolerated, nor will threats to other players or to our employees (including Customer Support).
Contribute or Post User Content or organize or participate in any activity or group that could be considered unlawful, inappropriate, abusive, harassing, profane, threatening, hateful, offensive, vulgar, obscene, sexually explicit, defamatory, infringing, an invasion of privacy, or otherwise objectionable.
Post any User Content, such as a topic, name, screen name, avatar, persona, or other material or information, that could be considered inappropriate, abusive, hateful, harassing, profane, defamatory, threatening, hateful, obscene, sexually explicit, infringing, an invasion of privacy, vulgar, offensive, indecent, or unlawful.
Post a message or other User Content for any purpose other than personal communication, including advertising, spam, chain letters, pyramid schemes, and other types of solicitation or commercial activities.
Impersonate another person or falsely imply that you are our employee or representative (or the employee or representative of our affiliates or corporate parents).
Improperly use in-game support or complaint buttons or make false reports to Customer Support.
Attempt to obtain, or phish for, a password, account information, or other private information from anyone else on the Services or from our employees.
Use any payment methods to access or purchase Services for fraudulent purposes, without permission of the authorized owner, or otherwise in connection with a criminal offense or other unlawful activity.
Use any robot, spider, malware, or other automated device or process to access this website for any purpose or copy any material on this website.
Use or distribute unauthorized software programs or tools, such as “auto” software programs, “macro” software programs, “cheat utility” software program, or similar applications, exploits, cheats, or any other game hacking, altering, or cheating software or tool, including “tricks” or “cheats” designed to obtain discounted or free virtual goods or Virtual Items (as defined below).
Modify any file or any other part of the Services that we do not specifically authorize you to modify.
Use, develop, host, distribute, or Post exploits, cheats, automation software (bots), undocumented features, design errors, or problems in the Services or in any content offered by the Services, including virtual goods or Virtual Items (as defined below), or engage in any form of cheating, boosting, or booting.
Use any techniques to alter or falsify a device’s location (for example, GPS spoofing).
Use or distribute counterfeit software or content, including virtual goods or Virtual Items (as defined below).
Attempt to use the Services on or through any service that we do not control or authorize.
Sell, buy, trade, or otherwise transfer or offer to transfer your account, any personal access to the Services, including Virtual Items (as defined below) and other entitlements, either within the Services or on a third-party website, or in connection with any out-of-game transaction, unless expressly authorized by us.
Use the Services in a country in which we are prohibited from offering such services under applicable export control laws or any similar laws or regulations.
Use your full name as your username or persona on any game, use a username or persona used by someone else, or use a username or persona that could be considered vulgar, offensive, otherwise objectionable, or an invasion of third-party rights.
Engage in any other activity that disturbs the peaceful, fair, and respectful environment of the Services.
Use, Post, or repost information about users that may be publicly available in the Services (e.g., on a leaderboard or in a chat feature) for any purpose unrelated to the Services, including to attempt to identify or contact those users in the real world.
Interfere with or disrupt the Services or any server or network used to support or provide the Services, including any hacking or cracking of the Services.
Use any software or program that damages, interferes with, or disrupts the Services or another’s computer or property, such as denial of service attacks, spamming, hacking, or uploading computer viruses, worms, Trojan horses, cancelbots, spyware, corrupted files, and time bombs.
Promote, encourage, participate in, or facilitate any of the activities described above.
Consequences for Non-Compliance
— Failure to comply with this Code of Conduct (or any other aspect of these Terms) may result in the suspension of your account and access to the Services (or any part of them), the termination of your account and access to the Services (or any part of them), and/or subject you to any of the penalties identified in these Terms or available under applicable law.
Your Sole Responsibility for Interactions with Other Users; Your Release of Us
Your Interactions with Other Users
— As a user, you remain solely responsible for your interactions with other players, including how you interact with other players through your User Content.  If you have a problem with another player, we are not required to get involved, but we may choose to become involved.  If requested by us, you will cooperate fully with any investigation, including by granting us access to any portion of your account that may be relevant to the investigation.
Your Release of Us
— Unless otherwise provided under applicable law, if you have a dispute with another player, you release us (and our employees, officers, directors, agents, corporate parents, affiliates, subsidiaries, and joint ventures, and each of their respective legal representatives, successors, and assigns) from any claims, demands, losses, costs, liabilities, damages (indirect, actual, or consequential, including loss of profits, goodwill, use, or data), and expenses (including attorneys’ fees) of every kind and nature, whether known or unknown, expected or not expected, contingent or absolute, apparent or not apparent, that arise out of or relate to that dispute.
Waiver of California Civil Code Section 1542
— If you reside in California, you acknowledge familiarity with California Civil Code §1542, a statute that otherwise prohibits the release of unknown claims, which provides as follows:
A general release does not extend to claims that the creditor or releasing party does not know or suspect to exist in his or her favor at the time of executing the release and that, if known by him or her, would have materially affected his or her settlement with the debtor or released party.
You (as the “credit or releasing party”) expressly agree to waive any rights you may have under Section 1542 or under laws of similar effect in any applicable jurisdictions.
Report Conduct or User Content on the Services; Trademark & DMCA/Copyright Policy
Report Conduct or User Content on the Services — If someone may have violated these Terms (including the Code of Conduct), misused the Services, posted inappropriate User Content, engaged in inappropriate activity, or distributed illegal content, or if you have any other issue you would like to raise with us, please let us know by using any links provided in the Services or by contacting Customer Support at privacy@athena.studio.
In-Game Purchases, Virtual Items, and Payment Terms
In-Game Purchases and Virtual Items
— The Services do not require you to make any purchase of any kind.  The Services may include an opportunity to make in-game purchases or earn virtual, in-game items, including virtual coins, tokens, points, or other goods or services (collectively “Virtual Items”).  If you choose to purchase Virtual Items, you will be required to pay a fee using “real world” money to obtain a limited, personal, non-transferable, and revocable license and right to use these Virtual Items within the Services for your personal, non-commercial, and entertainment purposes only.  Virtual Items do not have an equivalent “real world” money value and can never be redeemed, transferred (to another user, between games, etc.), or cashed out for “real world” money, goods, or any other item of monetary value from us or any other party.  We offer Virtual Items only for additional entertainment value within our Services.
You understand that pricing for Virtual Items may be dynamic and may vary over time and for different users.  In addition, you understand that while you may “earn,” “buy,” or “purchase” Virtual Items in our Services, you do not legally “own” the Virtual Items and the amounts of any Virtual Item do not refer to “real” money or any credit balance in actual real-world currency.  We own your account and any related Virtual Items.  The amounts of any Virtual Items or any “virtual currency” balance shown in your account have no value outside of the game (e.g., in the real world), and instead only constitute a measurement of the extent of your limited license.  We may modify or eliminate Virtual Items (or the pricing of those Virtual Items) at any time and at our sole discretion, with or without notice.
Web Stores and Third-Party Payment Platforms
— Virtual Items purchased in our games on other applications stores or platforms, including Meta, Apple, or Google, will be subject to those platforms’ payment terms and conditions.  We do not control how you pay on third-party platforms and are not responsible (or liable) for processing those payments.  Please review those platforms’ terms and conditions for additional information.  Your order for Virtual Items will represent your offer to obtain a limited license for the relevant Virtual Items, which will be accepted by us when we make the Virtual Items available in your account or process your payment, whichever comes first. Your limited license to Virtual Items begins when we accept your payment. When you get a limited license to use Virtual Items, they will be available in your account until used through the Services or otherwise surrendered as a result of termination of the Services in accordance with these Terms.
You are not allowed to transfer Virtual Items outside of the Services (e.g., in the “real world”), for example by selling, gifting, or trading them.  We will not recognize those transfers as legitimate.  In addition, you may not sublicense, trade, sell, or attempt to sell Virtual Items for “real” money, or exchange Virtual Items for value of any kind outside of a game.  Any such prohibited transfer or attempted transfer will be void, and we may terminate your Account because of it, among exercising other remedies available to us under these Terms or applicable law.
Sales & Payment Terms
— When purchasing Virtual Items or other content as may be made available, you agree to pay us (either directly or through a third-party platform) the applicable charges for your purchase, including applicable taxes incurred by you or anyone using an account registered to you, using a valid payment method we (or the applicable third-party platform) may accept in accordance with the billing terms and prices in effect at the time the fee or charge becomes payable.
All sales of Virtual Items and/or other content are final.
If you are charged for Virtual Items that you did not purchase, or you did not receive the items you purchased, or you were charged an incorrect amount, you may request a refund or correction pursuant to our or the relevant third-party payment provider’s practices, guidelines, or policies.  As explained above, if you purchased Virtual Items on other applications stores or third-party platforms, including Meta, Apple, or Google, those purchases and any requests for refunds will be subject to those platforms’ payment terms and conditions and will need to be sent directly to those providers.  You can request a refund for purchases made directly from us by contacting Customer Support or following other instructions available from within our Services.  Any refund request to us must be received within 96 hours after the purchase.  Any refund request to third-party payment providers must be received within the time period specified in the relevant third-party payment provider’s terms.
ALL SALES ARE FINAL.
YOU ACKNOWLEDGE THAT WE ARE NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE A REFUND FOR ANY REASON, AND THAT YOU WILL NOT RECEIVE MONEY OR OTHER COMPENSATION FOR UNUSED VIRTUAL ITEMS WHEN AN ACCOUNT IS CLOSED, WHETHER SUCH CLOSURE WAS VOLUNTARY OR INVOLUNTARY, OR WHETHER YOU MADE A PAYMENT THROUGH OUR SITE OR SERVICES OR ANOTHER PLATFORM SUCH AS APPLE, GOOGLE, META, OR ANY OTHER SITES OR PLATFORMS WHERE WE OFFER OUR SERVICES.  YOU WILL FORFEIT ALL VIRTUAL ITEMS IF WE TERMINATE OR SUSPEND YOUR ACCOUNT FOR ANY REASON, IN OUR SOLE DISCRETION, OR IF THE SERVICES (OR ANY ASPECT OF THEM) BECOME NO LONGER AVAILABLE. IF YOUR ACCOUNT, OR A PARTICULAR SUBSCRIPTION FOR THE SERVICES ASSOCIATED WITH YOUR ACCOUNT, IS TERMINATED, SUSPENDED, AND/OR IF WE HAVE TO REMOVE OR REVOKE ANY VIRTUAL ITEMS FROM YOUR ACCOUNT, NO REFUND WILL BE GRANTED, AND NO VIRTUAL ITEMS WILL BE CREDITED TO YOU OR CONVERTED TO CASH OR OTHER FORMS OF REIMBURSEMENT.
PURCHASES TO ACQUIRE A LIMITED LICENSE AND RIGHT TO USE VIRTUAL ITEMS ARE NON-REFUNDABLE TO THE FULL EXTENT ALLOWED BY LAW.
You agree that all sales of Virtual Items to you are final, and we have no obligation to refund any transaction once it has been made.  You agree that when you purchase a Virtual Item, you request that the Virtual Item be delivered to you as soon as your order has been accepted.  If you live in the European Economic Area or in the United Kingdom, this means that you will lose your statutory right to withdraw from your purchase of a Virtual Item and the associated terms as soon as you access and use that Virtual Item.
If, for any reason, you are refunded for a purchase of a Virtual Item, then we may also revoke your access to that Virtual Item.  We may (i) refuse a request for a refund, (ii) suspend or cancel payment of a refund we have agreed to make, and (iii) revoke your access to a Virtual Item to which that refund relates, if we find evidence of fraud, abuse, or other manipulative behavior by you.
Recurring Subscriptions
— We may offer subscriptions to a recurring payment plan for the Services, including Virtual Items.  By purchasing a subscription (or activating a free trial subscription that automatically converts to a paid subscription if not canceled prior to the expiration of the free trial period), you request that we begin supplying the subscription Services immediately and you have entered into a periodic subscription contract with us.  Your subscription will automatically renew after the specified cycle (e.g., 30 days) without notice unless you cancel.  On your renewal date (or the date on which your free trial converts to a paid subscription, if not canceled by you), we will automatically charge the payment method associated with your account, plus applicable taxes, until you cancel.  Please note that prices and charges, including the fees associated with any subscriptions or the prices for any Virtual Items, may change at any time and in our sole discretion.  If we make a change to the periodic subscription rate, we will let you know in advance and give you the option to cancel.
Subscriptions purchased through third-party platforms will be charged by the platform in accordance with its payment terms.  Please review the appropriate platform’s payment terms carefully for additional information.
Subscriptions Auto-Renew Unless Canceled
— Your subscription will automatically renew each subscription period unless and until you terminate your subscription, or we terminate it.
You must cancel your subscription before it renews each billing period (or your trial subscription before expiration of the trial period), otherwise payment of the subscription fees for the next period will be taken automatically via your chosen payment method.
You are solely responsible for the timely payment of all fees and charges and in ensuring the accuracy of the payment information associated with your account.  If your payment does not process for any reason, your subscription may be automatically canceled.
Cancellation of Subscriptions
— For subscriptions purchased through us, you can cancel at any time by contacting Customer Support or navigating to the payment settings page (if applicable).  For subscriptions purchased through a platform such as Apple or Google, you may cancel at any time directly through the platform, as follows: you can manage and cancel your subscription at any time in the “Settings” of your device.  For iOS subscriptions, please see Apple’s support page available
here
.  For Google Play subscriptions, please see Google Play’s support page available
here
.
EXCEPT WHERE REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE LAW, SUBSCRIPTION PAYMENTS ARE NON-REFUNDABLE AND THERE WILL BE NO REFUNDS OR CREDITS FOR PARTIALLY USED SUBSCRIPTION PERIODS.
If you live in the European Economic Area or in the United Kingdom, then you may withdraw from your initial purchase of a subscription within 14 days of that purchase.  To withdraw from a subscription, you must send us a clear written communication of your decision before the end of the 14-day withdrawal period.  If you purchased the subscription through a third-party retailer (like Apple or Google), then you should send this communication to them, and they will carry out this refund. You can request a refund from Apple (
here
) and you can request a refund from Google (
here
).  If you purchased the subscription directly from us, you request a refund by contacting Customer Support or following other instructions available from within the Services.
Links to Third-Party Websites, Resources, or Advertising
Our Services may feature advertisements from us or other companies.  Our
Privacy Policy
explains what information we share with advertisers.  Please read our
Privacy Policy
carefully.
In addition, the Services may, from time-to-time, include third-party content, including links to third-party apps, products or services, websites, or resources.  Use of these third-party materials may require your compliance with applicable terms of service, terms of use, and privacy policies you have agreed and accepted with third parties.  You understand that, by using any third-party materials, you may encounter content that could be considered offensive, indecent, or objectionable.  You agree (i) that you use third-party materials at your sole risk; (ii) that we shall not have any liability to you for third-party materials; (iii) that we shall not be responsible for examining or evaluating the content, accuracy, completeness, timeliness, validity, copyright compliance, legality, decency, quality, or any other aspect of third-party materials.  We do not control third-party materials and provide them solely as a convenience to you.
You acknowledge sole responsibility for, and assume all risks arising from, your use of any third-party apps, products or services, websites, or resources.
Ending Your Relationship with the Services (and vice versa)
Suspension or Termination by Us
— To the full extent permitted under applicable law, we may suspend, terminate, modify, or delete your account(s) and/or access to and use of the Services (or any part of them), at any time for any or no reason, with or without notice or liability to you or any third party.  For purposes of explanation and not limitation, many account suspensions, terminations, and/or deletions may be the result of violations of these Terms.  If applicable, please refer to the notice that you received from us or contact Customer Support at privacy@athena.studio for additional information.
Termination by You
— You may terminate these Terms at any time by contacting us at privacy@athena.studio.
Effect of Termination
— Upon any termination or cancellation of the Services or your account(s), all provisions of these Terms which by their nature should survive will survive, including warranty disclaimers, limitations of liability, and dispute resolution provisions.
Your Indemnification of Us
To the full extent permitted under applicable law, you agree to defend, indemnify, and hold harmless us, our affiliates, parent corporations, and licensors, and their respective officers, directors, employees, contractors, agents, licensors, suppliers, insurers, and reinsurers from and against any claims, liabilities, damages, judgments, awards, losses, costs, expenses, or fees (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) arising out of or relating to these Terms, your use of the Services or any part of them, your Posting of User Content, or any violation of these Terms.  You agree to cooperate in the defense of actions covered by this provision.
Disclaimers and Limitation of Our Liability
Nothing in these Terms affects the statutory rights that you may have as a consumer of the Services.  Some jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion of certain warranties or the limitation of certain liabilities.  In those jurisdictions, the exclusions and limitations below shall apply only to the extent permitted by the laws of these jurisdictions.
Warranty Disclaimers
— You access and use the Services at your own sole risk.  We provide the Services on an “as is” and “as available” basis, without warranty of any kind.
We make no representations or warranties of any kind, express or implied, as to the operation of the Services, or the information, content, materials, products (including software), or other services included on or otherwise made available through the Services.  As set forth above, the Services’ performance may be affected by your hardware, software, internet access, or other factors, each of which we do not control.  In addition, we may suspend, withdraw, or restrict the availability of all or any part of our Services at any time and for any reason.
You expressly agree that you use the Services at your sole risk. To the full extent permissible by law, we disclaim all warranties, express or implied, about the Services, including implied warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, quiet enjoyment, non-infringement or availability, and any warranties arising out of course of dealing or usage of trade.
We do not warrant that the Services will meet your requirements or be secure, free of viruses or other harmful components, or uninterrupted, that defects will be corrected, or that you will not encounter any connectivity problems or other technical issues.
We make no warranty regarding the quality, accuracy, timeliness, truthfulness, completeness, or reliability of any information, content, materials, products, or other services included on or otherwise made available through the Services, including User Content.
YOU ACCESS AND USE THE SERVICES AT YOUR SOLE RISK.  WE EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ANY WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ABOUT THE SERVICES.
Limitation of Our Liability and Cap on Damages
— To the full extent permissible by law, you acknowledge and agree that neither we nor any other party involved in creating, producing, or delivering the Services (including our affiliates and corporate parents), will be liable:
For any personal injury or indirect, incidental, punitive, special, exemplary, consequential, liquidated, or punitive damages, including lost profits, loss of data or goodwill, service interruption, computer damage, system failure, or the cost of substitute services, in anyway whatsoever (and under any theory in any applicable jurisdiction, including warranty, contract, and tort or negligence) arising out of or in connection with these Terms or your use of or access to the Services, even if we have been advised of the possibility of such damages; or
For the conduct of third parties, including other users of the Services, User Content, and any operators of external platforms, apps, products or services, websites, or resources.  You acknowledge sole responsibility for, and assume all risk arising from, your use of any third-party platforms, products or services, websites, or resources. The risk of using any third-party app or third-party platform rests entirely with you.
THE RISK OF USING THE SERVICES RESTS ENTIRELY WITH YOU, AS DOES THE RISK OF ANY FORM OF INJURY FROM THE SERVICES OR THE CONDUCT OF THIRD PARTIES.
In addition, to the full extent permissible by law, the aggregate (or total) liability of us (and any other party involved in creating, producing, or delivering the Services, including our affiliates and corporate parents) to you arising out of or relating to these Terms, your relationship with us, or your use of or access to the Services will not exceed the total amount paid by you in the six (6) months immediately before you first assert any claim.  These limitations and exclusions regarding damages apply even if any remedy fails to provide adequate compensation.  Notwithstanding anything in the foregoing, if no amount has been paid by you in the six (6) month period immediately before you first assert any claim, our aggregate (total) liability in any form of action whatsoever in connection with these Terms, your relationship with us, or your use of or access to the Services will be the total sum of twenty U.S. dollars (US$20).
Time Limitation on Your Claims against Us
You agree that any claim you may have arising out of or relating to these Terms or your relationship with us must be filed within one (1) year after the purported claim arose.  Otherwise, you acknowledge and agree that your claim will be permanently barred as untimely.
Governing Law and Venue for Legal Disputes Not Subject to Arbitration
These Terms, and all claims or defenses based on, arising out of, or related to these Terms or our relationship under these Terms shall be governed by, and enforced in accordance with, the internal laws of the State of California, without reference to its choice of law rules or any principle calling for application of the law of any other jurisdiction.
Except as provided below, any disputes not subject to the Agreement to Arbitration set forth in these Terms shall be heard only in the state or federal courts located in Santa Clara County, California, unless we mutually agree to some other location.  Each of us consents to venue and personal jurisdiction in Santa Clara County, California, for purposes of any such action.
Informal Dispute Resolution Process; Agreement to Arbitration; Consolidated, Class Action, Collective Action, and Representative Action Waiver
PLEASE READ THIS SECTION CAREFULLY.  IT AFFECTS YOUR RIGHTS AND INCLUDES A WAIVER OF A TRIAL BY JURY IN A COURT AND OF THE ABILITY TO BRING ANY CONSOLIDATED, CLASS ACTION, COLLECTIVE ACTION, OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION.
Notice of Claim and Required Informal Dispute Resolution Process
In the event of any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to these Terms, we shall consult and negotiate with each other and, recognizing our mutual interests, attempt to reach a satisfactory solution, through first contacting Customer Support and then through the Informal Dispute Resolution Process described below.  If these informal efforts do not resolve the concern or issue, as explained in more detail below, we each agree to resolve any dispute between us through binding arbitration or small claims court instead of in courts of general jurisdiction.
If you have any concerns about, or experience any issue with, the Services, most user concerns or issues can be resolved by contacting our Customer Support team at privacy@athena.studio.
Before initiating the Informal Dispute Resolution Process (as described below) or any arbitration or court proceeding pursuant to this Section, you must first contact us to address your concerns or issues.  Most disputes can be resolved that way.
If you have any concern or dispute that we cannot resolve, you agree to then try to resolve the dispute informally (the “Informal Dispute Resolution Process”) and in good faith by contacting us and providing a written notice of claim (the “Notice of Claim”) by sending an email to privacy@athena.studio (Attention: Legal).  The Notice of Claim must provide us with an individualized and detailed description of the nature and factual basis of your individual, personal claim(s), the relief you seek (including a good-faith calculation of the specific amount in dispute), and information sufficient to identify your account(s) (such as a user ID or similar details).  Your Notice of Claim may only include your individual personal claim(s) and may not be combined with a Notice of Claim for other individuals.  After submitting your Notice of Claim, you then agree to meet and confer by email, telephonically, or by videoconference (such as Zoom), in good faith regarding your individual claim before taking any further action.
If any dispute related to your Notice of Claim cannot be resolved through the Informal Dispute Resolution Process within sixty (60) days of our receipt of the Notice of Claim, this Section explains how you and we agree to resolve it.
As explained in more detail below, except for certain exceptions described below, we each agree to resolve any dispute between us through binding arbitration or small claims court instead of in courts of general jurisdiction.  You understand and agree that you and we are giving up the right to sue in court and the right to have a trial before a judge or jury.
Agreement to Arbitration; Exceptions to Agreement to Arbitration
If we cannot resolve our dispute through customer support or through an Informal Dispute Resolution Process (as described above),
YOU AND WE AGREE TO RESOLVE ALL DISPUTES AND CLAIMS BETWEEN US IN INDIVIDUAL BINDING ARBITRATION BEFORE A SINGLE ARBITRATOR, INCLUDING CLAIMS CONCERNING ANY ASPECT OF THE RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN US, YOUR ACCESS TO OR USE OF THE SERVICES, YOUR USE OF ANY GAME, ANY USER CONTENT, OR YOUR ACCOUNT.
This Agreement to Arbitration is intended to be interpreted broadly, and it applies to all disputes or claims of any kind under any theory (whether based in contract, tort, statute, fraud, misrepresentation, or any other legal theory) that you may have or assert against us.
You and we agree that the arbitrator shall have the exclusive authority to resolve any dispute arising out of or relating to these Terms or the breach, termination, enforcement, interpretation, or validity thereof, including the determination of the scope, applicability, or enforceability of this Agreement to Arbitration.  This includes questions about whether any dispute between us is subject to this Agreement to Arbitration (i.e., the arbitrator will decide the arbitrability of any dispute) and whether all or any part of these terms are void or voidable.
Please note that an arbitration is a proceeding before a neutral arbitrator, instead of before a judge or jury.  Arbitration is less formal than a lawsuit in court and provides more limited discovery.  It follows different rules than court proceedings and is subject to very limited review by courts.  The arbitrator will issue a written decision and provide a statement of reasons if requested by either party.
YOU UNDERSTAND THAT YOU AND WE ARE GIVING UP THE RIGHT TO SUE IN COURT AND THE RIGHT TO HAVE A TRIAL BEFORE A JUDGE OR JURY.
Exceptions to Agreement to Arbitration
This Section
does not apply
to the following types of claims or disputes, which you or we may bring in court in accordance with these Terms:
(1) claims of infringement or other misuse of intellectual property rights, including such claims seeking injunctive relief;
(2) claims for preliminary injunctive relief for violations of these Terms;
(3) claims to request enforcement or recognition of any award or order in any appropriate jurisdiction; and
(4) our ability to suspend or terminate access to the Services pursuant to these Terms.
Small Claims Court — This Section does not prevent you from bringing your dispute to the attention of any federal, state, or local government agencies that can, if the law allows, seek relief from us for you.  In addition, any of us can bring a claim in small claims court either in Santa Clara County, California, or the county or jurisdiction where you live, or some other place we both agree on, if such claims meet the requirements to be brought in that small claims court.  If either party files a claim in arbitration that could have been brought in small claims court, the other party may elect to resolve the claim through small claims court (rather than through arbitration) by providing notice to the other party before appointment of an arbitrator; upon receipt of such notice, the arbitration provider shall administratively close the case before assessing any fees, and the party bringing the claim must proceed in small claims court in lieu of arbitration.
Our Right to Opt-Out of Mass Arbitrations — In addition, if ten or more demands for arbitration are filed that share common factual or legal issues, and if counsel for the parties submitting those demands are the same or coordinated, we have the right to opt out of the provisions of this Agreement to Arbitration and elect to resolve the claim through small claims court (if applicable) or courts of general jurisdiction (rather than through arbitration) by providing notice to the other parties (and the arbitration provider) of our opt out and election before appointment of an arbitrator.  Upon receipt of such notice, the arbitration provider shall administratively close the case before assessing any fees, and the parties bringing the claims must proceed in small claims court (if applicable) or courts of general jurisdiction in lieu of arbitration.
Procedure for Arbitration
The Federal Arbitration Act applies to this Section.  The arbitration will be governed by the (i) Streamlined Arbitration Rules & Procedures of JAMS and (ii) the Mass Arbitration Procedures and Guidelines of JAMS if five or more demands for arbitration are filed that share common factual or legal issues and if counsel for the parties submitting those demands are the same or coordinated (collectively the “Rules”), as modified by these Terms.  The Rules are available at
https://www.jamsadr.com/rules-streamlined-arbitration/
and
https://www.jamsadr.com/mass-arbitration-procedures
.  We shall appoint one arbitrator (fluent in English), who will be bound by these Terms.  In the event of a conflict between the rules of the arbitration provider and the Terms, including with respect to the assessment of the fees and costs of arbitration, these Terms will govern.
To start an arbitration proceeding, use the form available on the JAMS website (
https://www.jamsadr.com/submit/
).  Your arbitration demand must include an individualized and detailed description of the nature and factual basis of your individual, personal claim(s), the relief you seek (including a good-faith calculation of the specific amount in dispute), and information sufficient to identify your account(s) (such as a user ID or similar details).  In addition, your arbitration demand must demonstrate your compliance with the preconditions to arbitration outlined above (e.g., first contacting customer support and then following the Informal Dispute Resolution Process before proceeding to arbitration).
Any arbitration under this Section that must take place in person (rather than through a more convenient virtual forum) will take place pursuant to the Rules and these Terms.  The parties agree that any live proceedings, including the arbitration hearing, will be conducted at a location reasonably convenient to both parties with due consideration of their ability to travel and other pertinent circumstances.
Payment of all filing, administrative, arbitrator fees, and costs of arbitration will be governed by the Rules, except as modified by these Terms.  If your claim is for US$25,000 or less, we agree to reimburse your share of the arbitration costs (but not your attorneys’ fees), including your share of arbitrator fees, at the conclusion of the proceeding, unless the arbitrator determines your claims are frivolous, your claims were brought for an improper purpose, or your arbitration costs are unreasonable as determined by the arbitrator.  If you seek more than US$25,000, the arbitration costs, including arbitrator compensation, will be split between you and us according to the rules of the arbitration provider.  Notwithstanding the above, if you demonstrate that you are unable to afford the fees or costs of arbitration, qualify for a statutory exemption, or if the arbitrator determines that your payment of any portion of the costs or fees would be cost-prohibitive (as compared to litigation), we will pay them.  Irrespective of the amount you seek, neither party shall be entitled to have their attorneys’ fees or costs paid by the other party; provided, however, that either party may seek to recover their attorneys’ fees and costs in arbitration if the arbitrator determines that the other party’s claims (or counterclaims) are frivolous or were brought for an improper purpose.
For non-US Users
In the event of any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to these Terms, including any question regarding its existence, validity, termination, or breach thereof, the parties shall consult and negotiate with each other in good faith and, recognizing their mutual interests, attempt to reach a satisfactory solution. If they do not reach a settlement within a period of sixty (60) days, then, upon notice by any party to the other(s), any unresolved controversy or claim shall be settled by arbitration administered by the International Centre for Dispute Resolution (“ICDR”) (
www.icdr.org
) in accordance with the provisions of its International Arbitration Rules. The place of arbitration shall be in London, England, or another location that you and we mutually agree to, and the number of arbitrators shall be one. The language to be used in the arbitral proceedings shall be English.
Consolidated, Class Action, Collective Action, and Representative Action Waiver
For disputes arising between us and you, or any other user, you and we agree that we can only bring a claim against each other on an individual basis. NEITHER YOU NOR WE CAN BRING A CLAIM AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS MEMBER IN A CLASS ACTION, CLASS-WIDE ARBITRATION, CONSOLIDATED ACTION, COLLECTIVE ACTION, OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION.  THE ARBITRATOR CANNOT COMBINE MORE THAN ONE PERSON’S CLAIM INTO A SINGLE CASE, AND CANNOT PRESIDE OVER ANY CONSOLIDATED, CLASS, COLLECTIVE, OR REPRESENTATIVE ARBITRATION PROCEEDING, UNLESS WE BOTH AGREE OTHERWISE IN WRITING.  NONETHELESS, IF ANY PORTION OF THIS CONSOLIDATED, CLASS ACTION, COLLECTIVE ACTION, OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION WAIVER IS DEEMED UNENFORCEABLE OR INVALID, THE ARBITRATOR SHALL HAVE AUTHORITY TO ISSUE ANY AND ALL REMEDIES AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
YOU UNDERSTAND THAT, ABSENT THIS AGREEMENT TO ARBITRATION, YOU WOULD HAVE HAD A RIGHT TO LITIGATE THROUGH A COURT, TO HAVE A JUDGE OR JURY DECIDE YOUR CASE, AND TO BE PARTY TO A CONSOLIDATED, CLASS, COLLECTIVE, OR REPRESENTATIVE ACTION.  HOWEVER, YOU UNDERSTAND AND CHOOSE TO HAVE ANY CLAIMS DECIDED INDIVIDUALLY AND ONLY THROUGH ARBITRATION.
30-Day Right to Opt Out
You have the right to opt out of the provisions of this Agreement to Arbitration within thirty (30) days after first becoming subject to this Agreement to Arbitration by sending us written notice of your decision to opt out to privacy@athena.studio.  Your notice must include your name, account information, the email address associated with your account (if applicable), and an unequivocal statement that you want to opt out of this Agreement to Arbitration.  If you opt out of this Agreement to Arbitration, all other parts of these Terms will continue to apply to you, and we also will not be bound by this Agreement to Arbitration.
Changes to this Section
Notwithstanding any provision in these Terms to the contrary, we agree that, if we make any future material change to this Section, you may reject any such material change by sending us written notice within thirty (30) days of the change to privacy@athena.studio.
Severability
This Section applies to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law.  If any competent authority deems any portion of this Section illegal or unenforceable, such provision will be severed and the remainder of this Section will be given full force and effect.
If any competent authority determines that applicable law precludes the arbitration of any claim, cause of action, or requested remedy, then that claim, cause of action, or requested remedy, and only that claim, cause of action, or requested remedy, will be severed from this Agreement to Arbitration (as described below), and will be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction.  If a claim, cause of action, or requested remedy is severed pursuant to this paragraph, then you and we agree that the claims, causes of action, or requested remedies that are not subject to arbitration will be stayed until all arbitrable claims, causes of action, and requested remedies are resolved by the arbitrator.
Survival
This Section shall survive termination of these Terms.
Miscellaneous Provisions
Photosensitivity Warning
— Certain people may react to certain images, backgrounds, features, or effects, including light patterns or flashing lights (regardless of whether they have a diagnosed condition or history) in our Services, Site, or other content.  If you or anyone in your family has an epileptic condition, consult your physician prior to playing.  If you experience any issues or symptoms while using our Services or playing a Game, IMMEDIATELY discontinue use and consult your physician before returning to our Services or resuming play.
Entire Agreement
— These Terms constitute the entire and exclusive understanding and agreement between us and you regarding the Services, and these Terms supersede and replace all prior oral or written understandings or agreements between us and you regarding the Services.
Severability
— If for any reason a court of competent jurisdiction finds any provision of these Terms invalid or unenforceable, that provision will be enforced to the maximum extent permissible, and the other provisions of these Terms will remain in full force and effect.
No Assignment or Transfer by You
— You may not assign or transfer these Terms, by operation of law or otherwise, without our prior written consent.  We may freely assign or transfer these Terms without restriction.  Subject to the foregoing, these Terms will bind and inure to the benefit of the parties, their successors, and permitted assigns.
No Waiver
— Our failure to enforce any right or provision of these Terms will not be considered a waiver of such right or provision.  The waiver of any such right or provision will be effective only if in writing and signed by our duly authorized representative.  Except as expressly set forth in these Terms, the exercise by either party of any of its remedies under these Terms will be without prejudice to its other remedies under these Terms or otherwise.
EEA Online Dispute Resolution Platform
— If you are a consumer in EEA, the European Commission’s Online Dispute Resolution Platform has been introduced to help consumers who have purchased goods or services online without going to court. If applicable, the platform can be found here:
http://ec.europa.eu/consumers/odr
.
California Notice
— Pursuant to California Civil Code Section 1789.3, we note the following for consumers from California: the Complaint Assistance Unit of the Division of Consumer Services of the California Department of Consumer Affairs may be contacted in writing at 1625 N. Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA 95834, or by telephone at 1(916) 445-1254 or 1(800) 952-5210.  We may be contacted in writing at the addresses set forth in the “Contact Information” section.
Contact Information
If you have any questions about these Terms or the Services, please contact us at privacy@athena.studio or the address set forth below:
849 High St, 94301, Palo Alto, CA, United States
EU and UK Privacy Representatives
We have appointed
Prighter Group
as our privacy representatives in the EU and UK.  You can contact us through our privacy representatives at the following addresses:
For residents of the EU:
PrighterGDPR-Rep by Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG
c/o ATHENA FZE
Kriegerstraße 44
30161 Hannover
Germany
For residents of the UK:
PrighterUK-Rep by Prighter Ltd.
c/o ATHENA FZE
20 Mortlake Mortlake High Street
London, SW14 8JN
United Kingdom
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://privacy.athena.studio/:
Search this site
Embedded Files
Skip to main content
Skip to navigation
PRIVACY POLICY
Last Updated: May 16th, 2024
ATHENA STUDIO develops and publishes social games for the web and mobile devices. This Privacy Notice (this “Notice”) describes the ways ATHENA STUDIO (“Studio,” “us”, “our” or “we”) collects, stores, uses, discloses or otherwise processes personal information of our users (“users” or “you”) in connection with their use of our products or services, including our product offerings such as our website available at https://athena.studio and Studio game(s) provided on a mobile platform or any other Studio product or service that posts or links to this Notice (each a “Service,” collectively, the “Services”).  Additionally, this Notice describes the rights and choices concerning your information that may apply to you.
This Privacy Notice covers the following topics:
Personal Information We Collect and How We Collect It
How We Use Your Information
Sharing of Your Information
Online Advertising
Security of Your Information
Data Retention
Children’s Privacy
Third-party Websites and Services
Transfer of Personal Information Outside Your Country
Managing Your Information
Specific Provisions for Certain Non-U.S. Users
Specific Provisions for Certain U.S. Multistate Users
Changes to this Notice
Contact Us
If you have questions regarding this Notice or our collection and use of personal information, please contact us as described in the “Contact Us” Section.
1. PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT AND HOW WE COLLECT IT
When you interact with or use our Services, we are collecting personal information about you. Sometimes we collect personal information automatically when you interact with our Services (e.g., information about how you interact with our Services) and sometimes we collect the personal information directly from you when you use our Services (e.g., information you give us when setting up your account or user profile).  At times, we may collect personal information about you from other sources and third parties, including other players.
Information We Collect Automatically or From You Directly
Registration Information
We may offer you the option to complete a user profile that is visible to other Studio users (“Account”). If you create an Account, you may provide us your name, a username, e-mail address, a password and other information that helps us confirm that it is you accessing your Account. We may do this through in-game dialog boxes, which you may choose to skip. If you sign into the Services with Facebook Connect, we will collect information that is visible via your Facebook account such as: (1) your first and last name, (2) Facebook ID, (3) Profile Picture/URL, and (4) list of Facebook friends. Your Account may be used to publicly identify you as part of social features of the Services, which may include user-to-user interaction, chat or messaging functionality, public leaderboards, head-to-head competition, and other similar features. Your username associated with your Account will be public and will be shown to other users.  In addition, your username will allow others to access information on your user profile that is considered public or that you have designated as public in your user profile settings.
Address Book Information
We may also offer you the ability to choose to import your contacts or manually enter e-mail addresses so that you can locate your contacts and invite your contacts to join you in the Services. This information is typically collected through the use of third-party mobile device software development kits. If you choose to import your contacts or manually enter e-mail addresses, we will store those contacts for purposes of helping you and your contacts make connections through our Services. You are responsible for ensuring your sharing of this information with us is compliant with applicable laws. In some countries, this may require you to get permission from the people you invite before you share their information.
Technical and Usage Information
When you access our Services, we may use cookies and other similar technologies to collect (i) certain technical information about your mobile device or computer system, including IP Address, mobile device ID (IDFA, Google Advertising ID or other identifiers), and the version of your operating system; and (ii) usage statistics about your interactions with the Services, including the links, objects, products and benefits you view, click, or otherwise interact with (also known as “Clickstream Data”). Our emails may also contain tracking pixels that identify if and when you have opened an email that we have sent you, how many times you have read it and whether you have clicked on any links in that email. In connection with your use of certain Services, we will create and assign to your device an identifier that is similar to an account number. In addition, in certain circumstances, we may collect the name you have associated with your device, device type, telephone number, country, and any other information you choose to provide, such as username, character name, or e-mail address. We may also infer your approximate geographic location based on your IP address.
Payment Information
When you order any good or service through the Services, including any virtual currency or virtual good, we collect certain non-financial transaction information related to these purchases, including what you purchased, the price, and the date.  Your in-app purchase transactions are processed by third-party payment processors, such as Apple (for purchases on iOS devices), Google (for purchases on Android devices), or Amazon (for purchases on Kindle devices). The third-party payment processors will collect your name, phone number, e-mail address, mailing address, billing address, and complete credit card information to enable them to process your payment.  The third-party payment processors may also retain this information to enable you to purchase additional items through our Services without having to re-enter your payment information each time. Please note third-party payment processors do not share your financial information, like credit card numbers, with us. In addition, please note that the third-party payment processors’ processing of transactions and collection and use of your personal information is governed by their terms of service and privacy policy, and purchases through these third parties may also be subject to additional policies.  We encourage you to review the terms of service and privacy policies of those third parties to learn more about how they handle your personal information.
Information Collected by or Provided to Customer Support
When you ask for assistance from our Customer Support team, we will collect and store the contact information you provide (generally your name and e-mail address), information about your game-play or activity on the Services, and your username or ID number. We will also store the correspondence and information within the correspondence that you choose to share with us.
Communication Preferences
We may collect information about your interests and communication preferences that you choose to provide, such as when subscribing to news or alerts.
Surveys, User Research Projects, Competitions and Promotional Events
If you choose to participate in, or fill out any forms relating to, Studio surveys, user research projects, competitions (contests/sweepstakes), promotional events, or similar activities, we will collect your contact information (such as your name, email, and phone number, address, and postal code) to enable you to participate in the activity and to allow us to communicate with you, as well as any other information that we request that you provide for purposes of the activities, including audio or video recordings, photos, and/or screen captures.  In connection with Studio surveys and user research projects, we may also collect your opinions, responses to certain research questions, prompts, or surveys, and other personal information, consistent with the purposes of the Studio survey or user research project.
On occasion, we may also collect your shipping and billing information to send you certain rewards or incentives, such as if you are a participant in a Studio survey or user research project, a competition winner, or if you purchase our products or services.   In addition, if you are a part of our event or promotion partner, we may also collect your personal information including your name, company email, and company address.
Please note that your participation in any Studio surveys, user research projects, competitions (contests/sweepstakes), promotional events, or similar activities, is completely voluntary.
Information We Collect From Other Sources
We may collect or receive information from the following other sources (i) other Service users who choose to upload their email contacts; (ii) third party information providers, such as digital advertising companies; and (iii) social networking sites. We may combine this information with the information we collect from an individual directly.
Sensitive or Special Categories of Information
We typically do not request or seek to elicit sensitive or special categories of information, but you may choose to provide this information to us in connection with certain of the interactions described above, including when you ask for assistance from our Customer Support team. The meaning of sensitive or special categories of information varies by jurisdiction and it could include, for example, health, genetic or biometric data, or precise location information.
Information You Choose to Share on the Services
A number of our Services provide features including chat rooms, messaging services, and community and event forums for collaboration, peer connection, games, and information exchange purposes.  Any personal information that you voluntarily choose to display on any publicly available portion of our Services, such as when you publish content, comments, or profile information, becomes publicly available and may be collected and used by others.
2. HOW WE USE YOUR INFORMATION
We use information collected through our Services for purposes described in this Notice or disclosed to you in connection with our Services. For example, we may use your information for:
Service Delivery
Create your Service accounts and allow access to our Services;
Identify and suggest connections with other Studio users;
Operate our Services;
Improve our Services;
Understand you and your preferences to enhance your experience and enjoyment using our Services;
Respond to your comments and questions and provide customer service;
Provide and deliver products and services you request;
Send you related information, including confirmations, invoices, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Conduct and administer surveys, user research projects, competitions and promotional events that you participate in;
Prevent fraud or potentially illegal activities, and enforce our Terms of Use;
Enable you to communicate with other users; and
Fulfill any other purpose for which you provide personal information.
Marketing and Advertising
Deliver and target advertising and marketing and promotional information to you; and
Communicate with you (including via email and push notifications) about promotions, contests, rewards, upcoming events, and other news about products and services offered by us and our selected partners.
Research and Development
Create aggregate or anonymous information derived from the personal information we handle, which we may use and disclose for research, development and other lawful business purposes;
Link or combine personal information with other information we get from third parties to help understand your preferences and provide you better services; and
Analyze information to choose to provide to us in connection with Studio surveys and user research projects to gain insights into how users engage with our Services, to improve our Services, to consider developing new products or services, and other lawful purposes.
Compliance and Protection
Comply with applicable laws, lawful requests, and legal process, such as to respond to subpoenas or requests from government authorities;
Protect our, your or others’ rights, privacy, safety, or property (including by investigating, bringing, making, or defending legal claims);
Audit our internal processes for compliance with legal and contractual requirements or our internal policies;
Enforce the terms and conditions that govern the Services; and
Prevent, identify, investigate, and deter fraudulent, harmful, unauthorized, unethical or illegal activity, including cyberattacks and identity theft.
Email or Push Notifications
We may occasionally send you email or push notifications through our Service to send you game updates, high scores and other service-related notifications that may be of importance to you, as well as to send marketing communications.  You may at any time opt-out from receiving these types of communications by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link (or a similar link) at the bottom of our marketing emails or by turning them off at the device level through your settings.
3. SHARING OF YOUR INFORMATION
We may share information we collect with the following third parties for the specified purposes:
Service Providers
We may share your information with service providers that perform services on our behalf or enhance our Services, including platform providers, hosting services, customer support services, analytics services, and marketing partners.
Categories of Personal Information
Identifiers, such as name, username, email address and other contact information, IP address, and online identifiers (like advertising IDs and cookies)
Commercial Information, such as purchase history, in-app purchases, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Internet or Network Information, such as information regarding interactions with a website, application, or advertisement
Geolocation Data, such as city or county-level geolocation information
Inferences, such as the derivation of information, data, or assumptions from the categories of personal information included above
Affiliates
We may share your information with our parent company(ies), affiliates, or subsidiaries.
Categories of Personal Information
Identifiers, such as name, username, email address and other contact information, IP address, and online identifiers (like advertising IDs and cookies)
Additional California Customer Records, such as address book information
Commercial Information, such as purchase history, in-app purchases, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Internet or Network Information, such as information regarding interactions with a website, application, or advertisement
Geolocation Data, such as city or county-level geolocation information
Inferences, such as the derivation of information, data, or assumptions from the categories of personal information included above
Payment Processors
We may share your information with third-party payment processors that process payments you make in our Services.
Categories of Personal Information
Identifiers, such as name, username, email address and other contact information, IP address, and online identifiers (like advertising IDs and cookies)
Commercial Information, such as purchase history, in-app purchases, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Your Specified Recipients
We may disclose your information to individuals or other third parties or publicly with your consent or at your direction.
Categories of Personal Information
Identifiers, such as name, username, email address and other contact information, IP address, and online identifiers (like advertising IDs and cookies)
Additional California Customer Records, such as address book information
Commercial Information, such as purchase history, in-app purchases, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Internet or Network Information, such as information regarding interactions with a website, application, or advertisement
Geolocation Data, such as city or county-level geolocation information
Advertising Partners
We may share your information with advertisers, ad exchanges and other ad technology companies that require the data to select and serve relevant advertisements to you and others, and assist us in our marketing efforts, including as described in the Online Advertising section below.
Categories of Personal Information
Identifiers, such as name, username, email address and other contact information, IP address, and online identifiers (like advertising IDs and cookies)
Commercial Information, such as purchase history, in-app purchases, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Internet or Network Information, such as information regarding interactions with a website, application, or advertisement
Geolocation Data, such as city or county-level geolocation information
Inferences, such as the derivation of information, data, or assumptions from the categories of personal information included above
Government Entities/Law Enforcement
We may share your information with law enforcement and public authorities, as we believe in good faith to be necessary or appropriate for the compliance and protection purposes described above.
Categories of Personal Information
Identifiers, such as name, username, email address and other contact information, IP address, and online identifiers (like advertising IDs and cookies)
Internet or Network Information, such as information regarding interactions with a website, application, or advertisement
Geolocation Data, such as city or county-level geolocation information
**
We may also share your information with
professional advisors
, such as lawyers, auditors, bankers, and insurers, where necessary in the course of the professional services that they render to us.  In addition, in the event of a merger, acquisition, reorganization, bankruptcy, or other similar event, we may share your information (or it may be transferred) to our
business transferees
,
successors
, or
assigns
.
Because the specific information that we may share and our reasons for doing so vary depending on the circumstances, how long the information may be retained can also vary.  As explained below, we and our affiliates, subsidiaries, agents, contractors, and service providers generally retain information for as long as we reasonably need it for the purposes described in this policy (like complying with our legal obligations, managing internal records, enforcing our terms, and resolving disputes), unless applicable law requires or permits a longer retention period.
4. ONLINE ADVERTISING
Interest-Based Advertising
To the extent we display advertising in our Services, with your consent as may be required by applicable law, we may share or we may allow online advertising networks, social media companies, and other third-party services to collect information about your use of our Services over time to enable them to play or display ads on our Services, on other devices you may use, and on other websites, apps, or services.  Typically, though not always, the information we share is provided through cookies, software integrations, or similar tracking technologies, which recognize the device you are using.  We and our third-party partners use this information to try to make the advertisements you see online more relevant and tailored to your interests, as well as to provide advertising-related services such as reporting, attribution, analytics, and market research.   Such information includes the following:
Device make, model and operating system;
Device properties related to screen size & orientation, audio volume and battery;
Carrier;
Operating system;
Name and properties of mobile application through which the user interacts with the Services;
Country, time zone and locale settings (country and preferred language);
Network connection type and speed;
IP Address;
Keywords;
City- and/or country-level geolocation data;
Internet browser user-agent used to access the Services; and
Advertising ID (IDFA on iOS devices and GAID on Android devices).
A list of these advertising partners and their privacy policies is available here:
AdColony
Attn: Privacy Officer
11400 W. Olympic Blvd., 12th Floor
Los Angeles, CA 90064
privacy@adcolony.com
http://www.adcolony.com/privacy-policy/
AppLovin Corporation
849 High St.
Palo Alto, CA 94301
care@applovin.com
https://www.applovin.com/privacy
Chartboost
420 Taylor Street
San Francisco, California 94102
privacy@chartboost.com
https://answers.chartboost.com/hc/en-us/articles/200780269-Privacy-Policy
Facebook, Inc.
1601 Willow Road
Menlo Park, CA 94025
https://www.facebook.com/help/contact/861937627253138
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
Google Play, AdMob, Google Play Game Services, Google Anayltics, Firebase Analytics
https://support.google.com/policies/troubleshooter/2990837?hl=en
https://play.google.com/about/play-terms.html
https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/
UnityAds
Unity Technologies
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, California 94107
privacy@unity3d.com
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy
Vungle
185 Clara Street,
San Francisco, CA 94107
marketing@vungle.com
http://vungle.com/privacy/
Fyber
Wallstraße 9-13
10179 Berlin Germany
https://www.fyber.com/#contact
https://www.fyber.com/privacy-policy/
InMobi
7th Floor, Block Delta, B Block Embassy Tech Square,
Kadubeesanahallli Village, Outer Ring Road, Varthur Hobli, Bangalore
https://www.inmobi.com/company/contact/
https://www.inmobi.com/privacy-policy
Mintegral
RM1204, 12/F, OfficePlus @Prince Edward,
794-802 Nathan Road, KL, Hong Kong 999077
privacy@mintegral.com
https://www.mintegral.com/en/privacy/
Amazon
410 Terry Avenue North Seattle,
WA 98109 United States
https://aps.amazon.com/aps/contact-us/
https://aps.amazon.com/aps/privacy-policy/
ironSource Ltd.
121 Menachem Begin Rd., Tel Aviv, Israel
Attn: Data Protection Officer
dpo@ironsrc.com
https://www.is.com/privacy-policy/
Smaato, Inc.
240 Stockton Street, 9th Floor
San Francisco, CA 94108
Or
Barcastraße 5, 1st Floor
22087 Hamburg, Germany
privacy@smaato.com
https://www.smaato.com/privacy/
Pangle
1 Raffles Quay, #26-10,
Singapore 048583
https://www.pangleglobal.com/privacy/enduser-en
Yahoo
Customer Care - Privacy Policy Issues
1199 Coleman Ave,
San Jose, CA 95110
https://legal.yahoo.com/us/en/yahoo/privacy/index.html
Tapjoy, Inc.
Attn: Privacy
353 Sacramento Street, 6th Floor, San Francisco,
CA 94111, US
privacy@tapjoy.com
https://www.tapjoy.com/legal/general/privacy-policy/
Criteo
32 Rue Blanche,
75009 Paris, France
dpo@criteo.com
https://www.criteo.com/privacy/
The privacy policies of our partners may include additional terms and disclosures regarding their data collection and use practices. We encourage you to review those privacy policies to learn more about their data collection and use practices.
Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising
As described below, under certain conditions, you have the right to object and/or restrict the processing or handling of your personal information under applicable law.
Opt-Out through Device-Level Choices
.  You may limit data collection by third parties by visiting your mobile device settings and adjusting the device’s ad tracking settings (such as turning off the feature to “Allow Apps to Request to Track”) or by exercising other privacy options in your device’s settings.
Opt-Out through Industry Consumer-Choice Platforms
.  You may also visit
www.aboutads.info/choices
or
www.youronlinechoices.eu
(for individuals in the EU) to learn more about interest-based advertising and how to opt-out of this form of advertising on your web browser by companies participating in the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) self-regulatory program.  If you wish to opt-out of interest-based advertising in mobile apps on your device by companies that participate in the DAA’s AppChoices app, you may download that app onto your device and exercise your choice.  AppChoices is available at the links below:
DAA AppChoices iOS
DAA AppChoices Android
DAA AppChoices Amazon
Please note that electing to opt-out will not stop advertising from appearing in your browser or applications or reduce the number of ads that you receive.  You will still receive ads, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests.  In addition, if you use a different browser or erase cookies from your browser, or use a different mobile device, you may need to apply your opt-out choices to that particular browser or device.
Please note that the opt-out tools described in this section are provided by third parties, not by us.  We do not control and are not responsible for the effectiveness of, or compliance with, any third-parties’ opt-out options or programs or the accuracy of their statements regarding their programs. In addition, third parties may still use cookies to collect information about your use of our online services, including for analytics and fraud prevention as well as any other purpose permitted under the DAA’s Principles.
Opt-Out through Ads.  You may also be given the option to opt-out of interest-based advertising through an icon available on the face of an ad served to you.
If you have any questions about these opt-outs or rights you may have under applicable law, you can contact us at
privacy@athena.studio
or by writing to us at the physical address in the “Contact Us” section.
Do Not Track
Some Internet browsers may be configured to send “Do Not Track” signals to the online services that you visit.  We currently do not respond to “Do Not Track” or similar signals.  To find out more about “Do Not Track,” please visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.com
.
Managing Cookies
As described in this Privacy Policy, we use cookies to inform, optimize, and display ads based on your past visits to the Service and to tailor our advertisements and content to you.
Google Analytics and Advertising
. We utilize certain forms of display advertising and other advanced features through Google Analytics, including, but not limited to, Remarketing with Google Analytics, the DoubleClick Campaign Manager Integration, Google Ads, and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting. These features enable us to use first-party cookies (such as the Google Analytics cookie) and third-party cookies (such as the DoubleClick advertising cookie) or other third-party cookies together to inform, optimize, and display ads based on your past visits to the Service and to tailor our advertisements and content to you.  You may control your advertising preferences or opt-out of certain Google advertising products by visiting the Google Ads Preferences Manager, currently available at
https://google.com/ads/preferences
.  To learn how you can opt-out of data collection by Google Analytics, visit
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
You can also review your options to manage cookies by:
Opening the “Help” menu on the browser menu bar.  Most browsers will tell you how you can disable or delete cookies.
Visiting your mobile device developer’s website or reviewing your device manual. Most mobile device developers will tell you how you can manage the settings on your mobile device to opt out of and/or delete cookies from your mobile device, or to limit the use of your advertising ID, reset your advertising ID, and/or opt out of targeted advertising.
Visiting
https://optout.networkadvertising.org
and/or
http://youronlinechoices.com
, or if you are in the EU
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
, for choices to opt out of advertising.  You can also click on the AdChoices logo within an advertisement (where available).
If you reject all cookies, you may not be able to use certain features of our websites and other products and services.
5. SECURITY OF YOUR INFORMATION
We implement reasonable and appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect the security of your personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage.
However, no security system is impenetrable, and we cannot guarantee the security of your personal information.  Any transmission is at your own risk.
6. DATA RETENTION
We store data on servers in the U.S. or any other country in which the Studio or its affiliates, subsidiaries, agents or contractors or service providers maintain facilities. We retain your personal information for as long as needed to provide you Services, unless we are required by law to delete or if we accept your request to delete the information pursuant to applicable law. We will also retain and use your personal information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
When we no longer require your personal information, we will look to delete, destroy, or anonymize it pursuant to our typical procedures.  If this is not possible (for example, because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will apply security measures to your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion or destruction can occur pursuant to our typical procedures. If we anonymize your personal information (so that it can no longer be associated with you), we may use this information indefinitely without further notice to you.
7. CHILDREN’S PRIVACY
The Services are not intended for use by children (aged 16 or such higher age as required by applicable law). We do not knowingly collect personal information from children through the Services or knowingly allow them to use our Services.   If we learn that we have unintentionally collected personal information from a child, we will delete that information.  If you believe that we might have collected personal information from or about a child, please contact us at privacy@athena.studio.
8. THIRD-PARTY WEBSITES AND SERVICES
The Services may contain integrations or links to third-party websites or services, including those of our business partners.  By interacting with these third parties, you are providing information directly to the third party.  Please note that the Studio is not responsible for the privacy practices of these third parties or any entity that it does not own or control.  We encourage you to review the privacy policies and online terms of those third parties to learn more about how they handle your personal information.
9. TRANSFER OF PERSONAL INFORMATION OUTSIDE YOUR COUNTRY
We may transfer information that we collect about you (detailed in Section 1) to other countries or jurisdictions where we or our service providers and vendors operate for our legitimate business purpose, including our cloud storage provider located in European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland, and advertising partners listed above.  The data protection laws and rules in these countries may be different from those in the country where you live.  In these cases, we will provide appropriate safeguards to protect your personal data.  This may include applying the standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission for transfers of personal data or other safeguards recognized by applicable laws and regulations.
If you have any questions regarding potential transfers of personal information outside of the country where you live or would like to exercise your data rights in relation to such transfers, please contact us at
privacy@athena.studio
or write to us at the address set forth in the “Contact Us” section.
10. MANAGING YOUR INFORMATION
Subject to certain exemptions, you can manage information we receive about you, and you may have additional rights as explained in the “Specific Provisions for Certain Non-U.S. Users” and the “Specific Provisions for Certain U.S. Multistate Users.”
Information-Related Requests
— If you wish to review, change, or correct the information we have about you, or to withdraw your consent to the processing of your personal information, you may send an e-mail to privacy@athena.studio making this request.
Deleting Your Account
— If you would like us to delete your information, you may send an e-mail to privacy@athena.studio and place “Delete My Account” in the subject line.   Please note that, if you proceed with the deletion of your account, you will no longer have access to the game account or services associated with your account.  Other steps you should take should you wish to delete your account include disassociating your Facebook account from our mobile games, if applicable, and deleting the game from your mobile device.  Please note that if you ask us to delete your account, all your progress in the game and any unused virtual items will be lost and we may not be able to restore them in the future.  Please note that your information, for example records pertaining to payments or customer service matters, may be retained for legal and accounting purposes. If you have sent or posted content on the Service, we may not be able to delete it.
We will need to verify your identity before processing your request. In order to verify your identity, we will generally require the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems. In certain circumstances, we may decline a request to exercise the rights described above, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems. If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request.
Acting through an Authorized Agent or Representative —
In certain circumstances, you are permitted to use an authorized agent to submit requests on your behalf where (i) you provide sufficient evidence to show that the requestor is an authorized agent with written permission to act on your behalf and (ii) you successfully verify your own identity with us.
Response Time —
In accordance with applicable law, we aim to respond to a consumer request as soon as possible after receiving that request and any necessary verification. If we require more time, we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing.
11. SPECIFIC PROVISIONS FOR CERTAIN NON-U.S. USERS
These additional provisions apply to individual residents of those countries outside of the United States that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws, including the European Union General Data Protection Regulation, the United Kingdom Data Protection Act, and each of their associated regulations, as well as amendments to those laws or additional consumer privacy laws that have been enacted or may be enacted in the future.
This section addresses the specific disclosure requirements under those laws and provides additional information about how we collect, use, share, and otherwise process personal information, the rights of covered consumers in relation to that personal information, and the ways to exercise those rights.
Athena FZE, having its registered address at 849 High St, 94301, Palo Alto, CA, United States, is the “data controller” responsible for the processing of personal data in connection with our Services. This means that we determine and are responsible for how your personal information is used.
Your Privacy Rights
Depending upon applicable law, you, your legal representative, and/or your next of kin have certain legal rights in connection with your personal information that we hold.  However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases, we may decline your request as permitted by law.  Subject to certain exemptions, you have the right to:
Access and Correct Your Personal Information.
At any time, you may request to access the personal data that we hold about you. We may need to ask you to provide certain information to make sure you are who you claim to be. If you find the information on your account is not accurate, complete, or updated, then please provide us with the necessary information to correct it.
Erase or Restrict Access to Your Information
.  You may request to delete or restrict access to your personal data under certain conditions.  To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may postpone or deny your request if your personal data is in current use for providing Services or for other legitimate purposes, in which case we will let you know if we are unable to do so and why.
Transfer Your Personal Data (Otherwise Known as Your Right to Data Portability)
.  You have the right to receive your personal data that you have provided us in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and the right to transmit that data to another party of your choice, where technically feasible. However, this right shall not apply where it would adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others.
Right to Object and/or Restrict Processing of Your Personal Data.
Under certain conditions, you have the right to object to our processing of your personal data as outlined in Sections 2, 3, and 4, above.
Right Not to be Subject to Automated Decision-Making
.  Under certain conditions, you have the right not to be subject to automated decision-making, if applicable.
Withdrawing Your Consent
. Contact us if you would like to withdraw your consent to the processing of your personal data based on that consent. Exercising this right will not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before withdrawal.
Right to Make a Complaint
.  In accordance with applicable law, you have the right to lodge a complaint with an appropriate regulator.  The Global Privacy Assembly provides a publicly-available list of privacy authorities, which you can access
here
.  If you have a complaint about how we process your personal data, we encourage you to contact us at privacy@athena.studio and we will endeavor to address your request.
How to Exercise Your Privacy Rights
If you wish to exercise any of these rights or any other rights that you may have under applicable law, please contact us at privacy@athena.studio or write to us at the address set forth in the “Contact Us” section.
We will need to verify your identity before processing your request.  In order to verify your identity, we will generally require the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems.  In certain circumstances, you may also appoint an authorized agent to exercise any rights that you may have on your behalf.  If you choose to exercise any rights through an authorized agent, you will need to verify your identity directly with us before we can process any requests.  In addition, we will need written documentation demonstrating the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf.
If you make a request, we will typically look to respond within one month, although a longer period may be permitted.  In certain circumstances, we may decline a request, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems.  If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request.
Lawful Basis for Processing
With respect to each of the purposes for which we use your personal information (see Sections 2, 3, and 4, above), the lawful basis that we may rely upon will vary based on the nature of, and reason for, the particular use to which we are putting your personal information. However, typically we will use your personal information:
Where we need to do so to perform a contract we are about to enter into with you or have entered into with you – for example, this will be relevant where we use your personal information to provide you with the Services, to operate the Services, and to create and maintain your Account.
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests, and/or those of a third party, and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests – for example, this will be relevant where we share your personal information in the context of an actual or prospective corporate event, in these cases we and any relevant third parties have a legitimate interest in enabling those parties to investigate and, where relevant, to continue to operate, all or relevant part(s) of our operations.
Where we need to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation – for example, this will be relevant where we are legally obliged to provide your personal information to authorities to comply with lawful governmental or regulatory requests.
Where we have your specific consent to carry out the processing for the purpose in question  – for example, this may be relevant where we use your personal information to show you targeted online advertising, where required by law.
For questions about the lawful basis we rely on for data processing, please contact us at privacy@athena.studio or write to us at the address set forth in the “Contact Us” section.
Marketing and Advertising
From time to time, we may contact you with information about our services, including sending you marketing messages and asking for your feedback on our services. Most marketing messages we send will be by email or push notifications. For some marketing messages, we may use personal information we collect about you to help us determine the most relevant marketing information to share with you.
Where we rely on consent to send you marketing communications, we will only send you such messages if you have given us your consent to do so. You can withdraw your consent at a later date by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of our marketing emails or by updating your preferences in the settings page of the App or Service.
Data Transfers and Processing Outside Europe
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, your personal information may be processed outside of those regions, including in the United States.  In the event of such a transfer, we typically try to ensure a degree of protection similar to that applied in your home country is afforded to it by employing one of the following mechanisms:
Transfers to territories with an adequacy decision.
We may transfer your personal information to countries or territories whose laws have been deemed to provide an adequate level of protection for personal information by the relevant authorities (e.g., by the European Commission, UK Government, and/or Swiss Federal Council).
Transfers to territories without an adequacy decision.
We may transfer your personal information to countries or territories whose laws have
not
been deemed to provide an adequate level of protection for personal information by those relevant authorities (e.g., the United States).
However, in these cases, we may look to use specific appropriate safeguards approved by the relevant authorities, which are designed to give personal information the same protection it has in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland – for example, standard-form contracts approved by relevant authorities for this purpose.
In limited circumstances, we may rely on an exception, or ‘derogation’, which permits us to transfer your personal information to recipients in such countries despite the absence of an ‘adequacy decision’ or ‘appropriate safeguards’ – for example, reliance on your explicit consent to that transfer.
If you want further information on the specific mechanism(s) used by us when transferring your personal information, please contact us at privacy@athena.studio or write to us at the address set forth in the “Contact Us” section.
12. SPECIFIC PROVISIONS FOR CERTAIN U.S. MULTISTATE USERS
These additional provisions apply to individual residents of those U.S. States that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws, including the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and the California Privacy Rights Act, the Colorado Privacy Act, the Connecticut Data Privacy Act, the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and each of their associated regulations, as well as amendments to those laws or additional consumer privacy laws that may be enacted in the future.
This section addresses the specific disclosure requirements under those laws and provides additional information about how we collect, use, share, and otherwise process personal information, the rights of covered consumers in relation to that personal information, and the ways to exercise those rights.
Your Privacy Rights.
To the extent permitted under applicable law, you may be able to exercise the following rights in relation to the personal information that we may have collected about you, subject to certain limitations and requirements, including the verification of your identity and our right to retain information to comply with our legal obligations, among other circumstances.
Know and Access your Personal Information
You may request, up to two times in a 12-month period, that we disclose to you the categories and specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you, the categories of sources from which your personal information has been collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting your personal information, the categories of personal information that we disclosed for a business purpose, any categories of personal information about you that we sold or shared, the categories of third-parties with whom we have shared your personal information, and the business or commercial purpose for selling your personal information, if applicable, among other information required by applicable laws.
Request Deletion of your Personal Information
You have the right to request that we delete certain personal information that we may have collected from you.
Opt-Out of the “Sale” or “Sharing” of your Personal Information*
We do not sell your personal information in exchange for money or any other form of payment, nor have we done so in the last 12 months.
We may “share” personal information about you for purposes of serving you with personalized ads or content, otherwise known as “interest-based advertising,” “targeted advertising,” or “cross-context behavioral advertising.”
You have the right to opt-out of any future “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information as defined by applicable laws (and as explained below).
Non-Discrimination
You have the right to exercise the rights conferred on you by applicable laws without discrimination.
Data Portability
You have the right to request that we transmit certain personal information that we may have collected from you (or about you) to other entities, unless transmitting the information would not be technically feasible.
Correct Inaccurate Information
You have the right to request that we correct errors or inaccurate information in the personal information that we may have collected from you.
Limit the Use or Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information
In certain circumstances, you have the right to limit the use of any sensitive categories of personal information. As noted above, we do not collect or seek to elicit sensitive categories of personal information.
Opt-Out of the Use of Automated Decision Making
In certain circumstances, you have the right to opt-out of the use of automated decision making in relation to your personal information.
*Right to Opt Out of the “Sale” or “Sharing” of Your Personal Information
We do not “sell” information about our users as most people would commonly understand that term or in the way that certain laws primarily define the term “sale.”  We do not disclose your personal information in direct exchange for money or some other form of payment.
However, consistent with common practice among companies that operate online, we do “sell” or “share” information in the sense that we allow certain third-party advertising networks and other third-party businesses to collect and disclose your personal information directly from your browser or device through cookies or tracking technologies when you visit or interact with our websites, use our apps, or otherwise engage with us. These third parties use your personal information for purposes of analyzing and optimizing our Service and advertisements on our websites, on other websites or mobile apps, or on other devices you may use, to personalize content or to serve ads that may be more relevant to your interests, and to perform other advertising-related services such as reporting, attribution, analytics, and market research.
To learn more about how third parties collect information automatically on our Site and the choices you may have in relation to those activities, please see our
Online Advertising
section, above.
How to Exercise Your Rights
If you wish to exercise any of these rights or any other rights that you may have under applicable law, please contact us at privacy@athena.studio or write to us at the address set forth in the “Contact Us” section.
As described above, we will need to verify your identity before processing your request.  In order to verify your identity, we will generally require the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems.  In certain circumstances, you may also appoint an authorized agent to exercise any rights that you may have on your behalf.  If you choose to exercise any rights through an authorized agent, you will need to verify your identity directly with us before we can process any requests.  In addition, we will need written documentation demonstrating the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf.
We aim to respond to a consumer request within 45 days of receiving that request. If we require more time, we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing.  In certain circumstances, we may decline a request, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems.  If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request.
Collection, Use, Disclosure, Selling, and Sharing of Personal Information
. The chart in the “Sharing of Your Information” Section above summarizes the categories of personal information we collect, the sources of personal information collection, the business purposes for our collection, and the categories of third parties with whom we “disclose,” “sell,” or “share” personal information.  The chart describes our practices, both current and during the last 12 months.
Please see Sections 1, 2, and 3 of our Privacy Policy for additional details. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described below.
Identifiers
, such as name, username, email address and other contact information, IP address, and online identifiers (like advertising IDs and cookies)
Source(s) of Personal Information
You or your device(s)
Advertising partners
Affiliates
Business Purpose(s) for Collection
Service delivery
Delivery of advertisements
Technical support
Customer support
Processing payments
Analytics
Business research & development
Marketing & promotions
Platform protection & fraud prevention
Compliance with legal obligations
Categories of Third Parties to Whom We Disclose the PI for a Business Purpose
Service providers
Affiliates
Your specified recipient(s)
Government entities/law enforcement
Advertising partners shared* for interest based advertising
Additional California Customer Records
, such as address book information
Source(s) of Personal Information
You or your device(s)
Business Purpose(s) for Collection
Service delivery
Analytics
Business research & development
Marketing & promotions
Categories of Third Parties to Whom We Disclose the PI for a Business Purpose
Affiliates
Your specified recipient(s)
Sensitive Personal Information
, such as social security numbers, precise geolocation, or genetic and biometric data
Source(s) of Personal Information
We do not intentionally collect or seek to elicit “sensitive personal information” as defined under applicable laws
Business Purpose(s) for Collection
N/A
Categories of Third Parties to Whom We Disclose the PI for a Business Purpose
N/A
Commercial Information,
such as purchase history, in-app purchases, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
Source(s) of Personal Information
You or your device(s)
Business Purpose(s) for Collection
Service delivery
Delivery of advertisements
Analytics
Business research & development
Platform protection & fraud prevention
Compliance with legal obligations
Categories of Third Parties to Whom We Disclose the PI for a Business Purpose
Service providers
Affiliates
Your specified recipients
Payment processors
Advertising partners shared* for interest-based advertising
Internet or Network Information
, such as information regarding interactions with a website, application, or advertisement
Source(s) of Personal Information
You or your device(s)
Business Purpose(s) for Collection
Service delivery
Delivery of advertisements
Analytics
Business research & development
Platform protection & fraud prevention
Compliance with legal obligations
Categories of Third Parties to Whom We Disclose the PI for a Business Purpose
Service providers
Affiliates
Your specified recipients
Government entities/law enforcement
Advertising partners shared* for interest-based advertising
Geolocation Data,
such as city or county-level geolocation information
Source(s) of Personal Information
You or your device(s)
Business Purpose(s) for Collection
Service delivery
Delivery of advertisements
Analytics
Business research & development
Platform protection & fraud prevention
Compliance with legal obligations
Categories of Third Parties to Whom We Disclose the PI for a Business Purpose
Service providers
Affiliates
Your specified recipient(s)
Government entities/law enforcement
Advertising partners shared* for interest based advertising
Inferences
, such as the derivation of information, data, or assumptions from the categories of personal information included above
Source(s) of Personal Information
You or your device(s)
Business Purpose(s) for Collection
Service delivery
Delivery of advertisements
Analytics
Business research & development
Platform protection & fraud prevention
Compliance with legal obligations
Categories of Third Parties to Whom We Disclose the PI for a Business Purpose
Service providers
Affiliates
Advertising partners shared* for interest based advertising
* As further described above, we “share” this information with advertising partners for interest-based advertising.
13. CHANGES TO THIS NOTICE
We may update this Notice to reflect changes to our data and information privacy practices. If we make any material changes, we will notify you by means of a notice on the Services prior to the change becoming effective. We encourage you to periodically review this Notice for the latest information on our privacy practices. Please note that if we need to adapt the Notice to legal requirements, the new privacy Notice will become effective immediately or as required.
14. CONTACT US
Our Data Protection Officer
You may contact us or our Data Protection Officer at privacy@athena.studio or at the address below for further information.
849 High St, 94301, Palo Alto, CA, United States
EU and UK Privacy Representatives
We have appointed
Prighter Group
as our privacy representatives in the EU and UK.  You can contact us through our privacy representatives at the following addresses:
For residents of the EU
:
PrighterGDPR-Rep by Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG
c/o ATHENA FZE
Kriegerstraße 44
30161 Hannover
Germany
For residents of the UK
:
PrighterUK-Rep by Prighter Ltd.
c/o ATHENA FZE
20 Mortlake Mortlake High Street
London, SW14 8JN
United Kingdom
Additional information regarding our privacy representatives can be found at the following link: https://prighter.com/q/13136128500
Report abuse
This site uses cookies from Google to deliver its services and to analyze traffic. Information about your use of this site is shared with Google. By using this site, you agree to its use of cookies.
Learn more
Got it